District of Columbia statutes.
29-602.03

Partnership property.

Property acquired by a partnership shall be property of the partnership and not of the partners individually.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 33-102.03.
1981 Ed., § 41-152.3.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 203 of the Uniform Partnership Act (1997 Act).